Indiana, session 2026, HB1395.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-28-2-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 13. A health facility may not include in a contract
entered into, renewed, or amended after June 30, 2026, a provision
that prohibits a person from transferring a resident to a different
facility for hospice care.
2026 IN 1395—LS 6493/DI 147